Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5868
Violation; department; maintain action.

The department may, in accordance with the laws of the state governing injunctions and other process, maintain an action in the name of the state against any person who is engaging in an activity identified as requiring a certificate of need under the Nebraska Health Care Certificate of Need Act without first having a valid certificate of need or who is engaging in an activity prohibited under the act.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 68;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 54;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 38;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 34.